Alaska, session 34, HB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 16.05.300 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 16.05.300. Board meetings. (a) Each board shall hold [AT LEAST ONE 06 MEETING A YEAR AND] as many [OTHER] meetings as it considers necessary. 07 Each board shall select the time and place in the state for the transaction of business. 08 Each board shall maintain its office at the principal office of the department. 09 (b) The [IN ADDITION, THE] Board of Fisheries shall hold at least one 10 meeting or hearing a year in each of the following general areas: 11 (1) Upper Yukon - Kuskokwim - Arctic; 12 (2) Western Alaska (including Kodiak); 13 (3) Southcentral (including the Kenai Peninsula); 14 (4) Prince William Sound (including Yakutat); 01 (5) Southeast. 02 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.